Washington statutes.
RCW 42.36.050

Campaign contributions.

A candidate for public office who complies with all provisions of applicable public disclosure and ethics laws shall not be limited from accepting campaign contributions to finance the campaign, including outstanding debts; nor shall it be a violation of the appearance of fairness doctrine to accept such campaign contributions.

[ 1982 c 229 s 5.]

NOTES:

Public disclosure of campaign finances: Chapter 42.17A RCW.